Louisiana, session 2026, HB179.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:511 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§511. Court reporters,; retention and destruction of notes and recordings of criminal
cases
A. The court reporter shall retain indefinitely all notes and tape audio
recordings of a criminal case. However, if the record of the trial or other criminal
proceeding is fully transcribed, the court reporter shall retain all notes and tape audio
recordings which have been fully transcribed for a period of not less than two years
after transcription is completed. In criminal cases where all defendants are acquitted,
the court reporter need not retain the notes and tape audio recordings. Retention of
the tape and audio recordings are subject to the storage provisions provided in
Subsection B of this Section. The court reporter shall destroy any notes and tape
audio recordings of any matter upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 179 ENROLLED
B. The notes and tape audio recordings of any criminal case which are
retained by a court reporter pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be are the
property of the court in which the case was heard. The court reporter shall have the
duty to retain and maintain all such notes and tape recordings pursuant to the
provisions of this Section, although the notes and tape recordings shall remain the
property of the court. The court retains ownership of the recordings and notes, and
if a court reporter retires or leaves the employment of the court, all notes, audio
recordings, and other records of court proceedings shall remain in the custody and
control of the court and be retained pursuant to applicable retention statutes and the
provisions of this Section.
Section 2. Code of Civil Procedure Article 372(C) and (D) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 372. Court reporter reporters; retention and destruction of notes and recordings
of civil cases
* * *
C. The court reporter shall retain all notes and tape audio recordings in civil
cases for a period of not less than five years after the end of the trial. However, if
the record of the trial is fully transcribed, the court reporter shall retain all notes and
tape audio recordings which have been fully transcribed for a period of not less than
two years after transcription is completed. Retention of the tape and audio
recordings are subject to the storage provisions provided in Paragraph D of this
Article. The court reporter shall destroy any notes and tape audio recordings of any
matter upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
D. The notes and tape recordings of any civil case which are retained by a
court reporter pursuant to the provisions of this Article shall be are the property of
the court in which the case was heard. The court reporter shall have the duty to
retain and maintain all such notes and tape recordings pursuant to the provisions of
this Article, although the notes and tape recordings shall remain the property of the
court. The court retains ownership of the recordings and notes, and if a court
reporter retires or leaves the employment of the court, all notes, audio recordings,
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 179 ENROLLED
and other records of court proceedings shall remain in the custody and control of the
court and be retained pursuant to applicable retention statutes and the provisions of
this Article.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.